Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB754.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 48 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An executive branch official shall not expend any appropriations or funds,
including the use of state employee time or resources, to challenge any action of
the federal government without the written consent of the Attorney General.
(2) The Attorney General shall represent the Commonwealth in all litigation
affecting the Commonwealth. The Governor shall not use his or her office to take
a position on legal actions against the federal government without the written
consent of the Attorney General.
(3) (a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to enjoin the Governor or an
executive branch official from violating subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
If the Governor or an executive branch official is found to have violated
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, his or her office shall reimburse the
Attorney General for any expenses incurred in bringing forth the action.
(b) Any executive branch official who violates subsection (1) of this section
shall have committed an act of malfeasance, and an abuse of his or her
office and may be subject to removal from his or her office as provided by
law.
(4) (a) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity are waived to the extent
of liability created under this section.
(b) The Commonwealth waives immunity for prospective equitable and
declaratory relief under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States for cases brought against it in federal jurisdictions for similar
causes of action to that of this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:55 AM Jacketed